Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,270
Occupant protection system; three-point safety belt system; use required; when; exceptions.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) or (3) of this section, no driver shall operate a motor vehicle upon a highway or street in this state unless the driver and each front-seat occupant in the vehicle are wearing occupant protection systems and all occupant protection systems worn are properly adjusted and fastened.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, no driver shall operate an autocycle upon a highway or street of this state unless the driver is wearing a three-point safety belt system and it is properly adjusted and fastened.

(3) The following persons shall not be required to wear an occupant protection system or a three-point safety belt system:

(a) A person who possesses written verification from a physician that the person is unable to wear an occupant protection system or a three-point safety belt system for medical reasons;

(b) A rural letter carrier of the United States Postal Service while performing his or her duties as a rural letter carrier between the first and last delivery points; and

(c) A member of an emergency medical service while involved in patient care.

(4) For purposes of this section, motor vehicle means a vehicle required by section 60-6,266 to be equipped with an occupant protection system or a three-point safety belt system.

Laws 1985, LB 496, § 6;

Laws 1992, LB 958, § 6;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 39-6,103.07;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 366;

Laws 1993, LB 575, § 23;

Laws 1997, LB 138, § 41;

Laws 2015, LB231, § 36.